Maryland, session 2025, SB0414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, A PARENT OF A
STILLBORN CHILD MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE INCOME TAX IN AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO $1,000 FOR EACH BIRTH FOR WHICH A CERTIFICATE OF BIRTH
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0414*

SENATE BILL 414
RESULTING IN STILLBIRTH HAS BEEN ISSUED UNDER § 4–213.1 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE OR FOR WHICH A CERTIFICATE OF FETAL DEATH OR
ITS EQUIVALENT HAS BEEN ISSUED BY ANOTHER STATE.
(B) THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE CLAIMED ONLY
FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE STILLBIRTH OCCURRED.
(C) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, THE PARENT MAY
CLAIM A REFUND IN THE AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.